Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 37. Rights and Privileges

§ 881.
Repealed.
1973, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. April 4, 1974.

§§ 882,
883.
Repealed.
1969, No. 261 (Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 7, 1970.

§ 884.
Exemption from arrest.

Officers, noncommissioned officers, and enlisted persons who are members of the Vermont National Guard and on federal or State active duty, except in the case of treason, felony, or breach of the peace, shall be privileged from arrest and imprisonment by civil authority, from the date they are ordered to active duty until the time of their discharge from active duty.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 46.

§ 885.
Brevet rank.

When he or she deems it to be in the best interests of the Vermont National Guard, the Governor may, with the advice and consent of the Senate, confer brevet rank upon officers and enlisted members of the Vermont National Guard who have performed gallant, faithful, or meritorious service in the line of duty. A brevet rank conferred pursuant to this section shall only apply in the State of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 47.

§ 886.
Retirement of officers.

A member of the National Guard may be placed upon the retired list as provided pursuant to the provisions of 10 U.S.C. chapters 69 and 1225 and any applicable regulations adopted by the Secretary of Defense.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 10

, § 48.

§ 887.
Repealed. 2021, No. 10, § 49.